New York, session 2025-2026, S998.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 13-m of the workers' compensation law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 15 to read as follows: 3 15. Telehealth visits for psychological testing, treatment and coun- 4 seling by psychiatrists, psychologists and licensed clinical social 5 workers shall be permitted with one in-person visit within twelve months 6 of the first video telehealth visit and within six months of the first 7 audio-only telehealth visit unless (a) in the provider's professional 8 judgment, an in-person visit service is likely to cause disruption in 9 service delivery or has the potential to worsen the patient's condition, 10 or (b) would create undue hardship upon the patient or such patient's 11 family. A finding of undue burden shall include consideration of whether 12 travel to and from the in-person visit would cause undue financial 13 burden or unreasonable physical or mental distress. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01455-01-5